Massachusetts, session 194th, S1070.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of Chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking the following words:- "Petit treason shall be prosecuted and
punished as murder."
of 1